Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB486.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1638(b)(3) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended and subsections (a) and (b) are amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 1638. Advertising.--(a) Whenever any person makes an expenditure for the purpose of financing communications expressly advocating the election or defeat of a candidate, or ballot questions, through any broadcasting station, newspaper, magazine, outdoor advertising 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 facility, direct mailing, or any other type of general public political advertising, such communication:* * *(3) May not utilize artificially generated facsimiles of a human voice.(b) * * *(3) Any person, firm or corporation, political committee or party or member thereof, violating any of the provisions of this section, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or to undergo an imprisonment of not less than one (1) month nor more than two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court. A fine issued for a conviction of a violation of subsection (a)(3) is the personal liability of the candidate or treasurer of a committee or party and cannot be paid from contributions to the candidate, committee or party.(4) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall publish a list of all candidates and treasurers of committees and parties who have been convicted of a violation of subsection (a)(3) on the Department of State's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0486PN0470 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021